hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY әіңғүұқөһоаитенрсвйлпкьыяудмзшбчгщюжцёхфэъАВСМКГПТЕИЛФНДОЭРЗЮЯБХЖШЦУЧЬЫЪЩЙЁӘІҢҒҮҰҚӨҺ

SFX A N 45
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дар:0
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]з sf:дар:0
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]л sf:дар:0
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]м sf:дар:0
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]н sf:дар:0
SFX A 0 дар [аоуұыэ]ң sf:дар:0
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:дер:0
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:дер:0
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:дер:0
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:дер:0
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:дер:0
SFX A 0 дер [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:дер:0
SFX A 0 лар [аоуұыэ] sf:лар:0
SFX A 0 лар [аоуұыэ]й sf:лар:0
SFX A 0 лар [аоуұыэ]р sf:лар:0
SFX A 0 лар [аоуұыэ]у sf:лар:0
SFX A 0 лар [аоуұыэ]ю sf:лар:0
SFX A 0 лер [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:лер:0
SFX A 0 лер [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:лер:0
SFX A 0 лер [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:лер:0
SFX A 0 лер [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:лер:0
SFX A 0 лер [әеёиөүія] sf:лер:0
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]б sf:тар:0
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]в sf:тар:0
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]г sf:тар:0
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тар:0
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]д sf:тар:0
SFX A 0 тар [аоуұыэ]т sf:тар:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:тер:0
SFX A 0 тер [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:тер:0
SFX B N 57
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім [әеёиөүія]ю sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 ім и sf:ім:0
SFX B 0 м [аоұыэәеёөүіюя] sf:м:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]б sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]в sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]г sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]д sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ж sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]з sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]й sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]л sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]м sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]н sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ң sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]һ sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]р sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]с sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]т sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ф sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]х sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ц sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ч sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]ш sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоуұыэ]щ sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоұыэ]у sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым [аоұыэ]ю sf:ым:0
SFX B 0 ым у sf:ым:0
SFX B к гім [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:гім:1
SFX B қ ғім [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:ғім:1
SFX B к гым [аоуұыэ]к sf:гым:1
SFX B қ ғым [аоуұыэ]қ sf:ғым:1
SFX B п бім [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:бім:1
SFX B п бым [аоуұыэ]п sf:бым:1
SFX b N 54
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дарым:0
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]з sf:дарым:0
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]л sf:дарым:0
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]м sf:дарым:0
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]н sf:дарым:0
SFX b 0 дарым [аоуұыэ]ң sf:дарым:0
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:дерім:0
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:дерім:0
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:дерім:0
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:дерім:0
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:дерім:0
SFX b 0 дерім [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:дерім:0
SFX b 0 ларым [аоуұыэ] sf:ларым:0
SFX b 0 ларым [аоуұыэ]й sf:ларым:0
SFX b 0 ларым [аоуұыэ]р sf:ларым:0
SFX b 0 ларым [аоуұыэ]у sf:ларым:0
SFX b 0 лерім [әеёиөүіюя] sf:лерім:0
SFX b 0 лерім [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:лерім:0
SFX b 0 лерім [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:лерім:0
SFX b 0 лерім [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:лерім:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]б sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]в sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]г sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]д sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]к sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]п sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]с sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]т sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]х sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 тарым [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тарым:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:терім:0
SFX b 0 терім [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:терім:0
SFX C N 55
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 іміз [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:іміз:0
SFX C 0 міз [әеёиөүіюя] sf:міз:0
SFX C 0 мыз [аоұыэ] sf:мыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]б sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]в sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]г sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]д sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ж sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]з sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]й sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]к sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]қ sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]л sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]м sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]н sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ң sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]һ sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]п sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]р sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]с sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]т sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ф sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]х sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ц sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ч sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]ш sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоуұыэ]щ sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз [аоұыэ]у sf:ымыз:0
SFX C 0 ымыз у sf:ымыз:0
