hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
адамбаевтың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
азықтан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
айтар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
айғабақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аласылы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
алмалы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ам/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аоа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
арашалат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
арттырудың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ассигнацияла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
атастыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аудандардың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ауырғыш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аэс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ақаусыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ақылдысын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бадана/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
байғазы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
балғашы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
баспала/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
батырларымен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бағзы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
без/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бекіре/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
беріл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
биылғыша/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
болжыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
борышқордың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
буландырғыш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бырсит/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
білуін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бүрлен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бұрынғыдай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бөлмелі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
гектолитр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
гүңгір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
даңғырлақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
диктор/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дырдула/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дәмелендір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
екеуі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
еп/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ескерт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жадыбас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жалықтыратын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жарлығымен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жауыршөп/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
желпіндір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жиылып/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жыбырқай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жілікте/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жұмсауды/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
зауза/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
иба/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
иір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кездір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кепілдеме/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кеңк/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
контейнер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кірпияз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күлімдес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күңгірлет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көксары/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көрсете/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
лақылда/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мазмұндас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мансапқұмар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мақтаншақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мертігуші/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
модуль/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мысқылдаушы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мұнарашы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мәсішең/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
нашатыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
нұсқалы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ойына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
орлат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ошақшы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
панты/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
плантатор/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
пырт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
расул/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
рецензия/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сайыстарын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сапыласдас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
саябырла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
селтеңдес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сиқырла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
соқпақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
суырыпсалма/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сырмақша/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сүйкен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сәжде/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тайпа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
танымал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тасалы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
таңқит/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тескіле/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
толықтырғыш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
торшер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
трагик/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
туғызыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тысырлаттыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тіктеуіш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түбіттес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түктес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түсінісудің/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тұрмыс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тәлпіш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
төрелет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
уілдес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
фотограф/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
централизм/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шалқан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шатырлан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шекара/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шиіт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
штепсел/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шытыра/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шұба/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ылдым/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ықылықтат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ілмек/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қабаржы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қазотылы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қалайынша/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қамсақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қарайыңқыра/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қарсыласына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қатпарлан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қашықсын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қбш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қожаңдас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қоныштат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қошеметтет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қызарыңқы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қырбат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қыш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құмалақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құтылдыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үлгілес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үқсаған/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ұрыстыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әдіп/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әрекеттерін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өкіл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өштестір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
Ораз/BbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
